Ohio, session 136, HB317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5501.84 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5501.84. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Covered foreign entity" means an individual, foreign government, or party to which one or more of the following criteria apply: (a) The entity is designated on the consolidated screening list published by the United States department of commerce or entity list published by the United States department of commerce. (b) The entity is domiciled in the People's Republic of China or the Russian Federation. (c) The entity is under the influence or control of the government of the People's Republic of China or the Russian Federation. (d) The entity is a subsidiary or affiliate of an individual, government, or party to which any of divisions (A)(1)(a) to (c) of this section apply. (2) "Public entity" means the state and all political subdivisions of the state, including all boards, authorities, commissions, agencies, committees, councils, state colleges or universities, and other state entities created by the Ohio Constitution or the Revised Code. (3) "Small unmanned aircraft system" means a powered, aerial vehicle to which all of the following apply: (a) The vehicle does not carry a human operator and is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the vehicle. (b) The aircraft uses aerodynamic forces to provide lift. (c) The vehicle can fly autonomously or be piloted remotely. (d) The vehicle is either expendable or recoverable. "Small unmanned aircraft system" is commonly referred to as a drone and does not include a satellite. (B)(1) A public entity shall not purchase or otherwise acquire a small unmanned aircraft system that is manufactured or assembled by a covered foreign entity. (2) No state funds shall be used in connection with small unmanned aircraft systems manufactured or assembled by a covered foreign entity, including state funds that are awarded through a contract, grant, or cooperative agreement or that are otherwise made available. (3) On or after May 1, 2027, a public entity shall not operate a small unmanned aircraft system manufactured or assembled by a covered foreign entity.